CIK: 924717
Company Name: SURMODICS INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2019-12-03
Accession Number: 0001564590-19-045173


ITEM 1 BUSINESS. OVERVIEW Surmodics, Inc. and subsidiaries (referred to as Surmodics, the Company, we, us, our and other like terms) is a leading provider of medical device and in vitro diagnostic technologies to the healthcare industry. Our mission is to improve the treatment and detection of disease by using our technology to provide solutions to difficult medical device and diagnostic challenges. We aim to develop highly differentiated products designed to improve patient outcomes through enhanced treatment of vascular disease. Both our Medical Device and In Vitro Diagnostics businesses have partnered with many of the world leading and emerging medical device, diagnostic and life sciences companies to commercialize our proprietary medical device, surface modification and diagnostics technologies. The Company was organized as a Minnesota corporation in June 1979. We make available, free of charge, copies of our annual report on Form 10 K, quarterly reports on Form 10 Q, current reports on Form 8 K and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act ) on our website, www.surmodics.com , as soon as reasonably practicable after filing such material electronically or otherwise furnishing it to the SEC. We are not including the information on our website as a part of, or incorporating it by reference into, our Form 10 K. The SEC maintains a website that contains reports, proxy and information statements, and other information regarding issuers, including the Company, that file electronically with the SEC. The public may obtain any documents that we file with the SEC at http www.sec.gov . We file annual reports, quarterly reports, proxy statements, and other documents with the SEC under the Exchange Act. The information below provides an overview of the principal products, services and markets for each of our 2 business units. The discussion of other aspects of our business including research and development ( R&D ), intellectual property, marketing and sales, future acquisition strategy, significant customers, competition, manufacturing, government regulation and our employees applies to our business in general and we describe material segment information within these sections where relevant. MEDICAL DEVICE SEGMENT Advances in medical device technology have helped drive improved device efficacy and patient outcomes. The convergence of the pharmaceutical, biotechnology and medical device industries, often made possible by surface coatings and device drug delivery technologies (together, surface modification coating technologies ), presents an opportunity for major advancements in the healthcare industry. We believe the benefits of combining drugs and biologics with implantable and minimally invasive devices are becoming increasingly valuable in applications in cardiology, peripheral vascular disease, neurology, ophthalmology, orthopedic and other large interventional markets. In an effort to improve their existing products or develop entirely new devices, a growing number of medical device manufacturers are exploring or using surface modification coating technologies as product differentiators or device enablers. The continuing trend toward minimally invasive surgical procedures, which often employ catheter based delivery technologies, has increased the demand for hydrophilic (i.e., lubricious or slippery) coatings and other coating technologies, including drug delivery coatings. For example, stents, particularly drug eluting stents, have significantly reduced the need for repeat intravascular procedures or more invasive cardiac bypass surgery. Drug coated balloons ( DCBs ) have further transformed intravascular therapies by enhancing patient outcomes while not leaving stents in the vascular system. Transcatheter heart valve repair or replacement via a minimally invasive catheter based system has enabled the treatment of patients suffering from heart valve disease who are too ill to undergo open heart surgery. Positive clinical outcomes and acceptance by patients, physicians and insurance companies of such innovations has helped certain segments of the United States ( U.S. ) medical device industry grow at a faster pace than the economy as a whole. The attractiveness of the industry has drawn intense competition among the companies participating in this area. For many years, we have provided surface modification coating technologies that impart lubricity, prohealing or biocompatibility characteristics, as well as drug delivery capabilities to enhance our customers medical devices and delivery systems. Since fiscal 2013, with our investment in our DCB platform, we have been focused on a strategy to develop and manufacture proprietary medical device products that combine our surface modification coatings with medical devices or delivery systems ( whole product solutions ). We believe this strategy has and will continue to increase our relevance in the medical device 4 industry . The strategy is key to our future growth and profitability, given the prospect of capturing more revenue and operating margin with whole product solutions as compared with device enabling technologies. We also continue to develop and commercialize our surface modification coating technologies through license agreements with third party medical device manufacturers . We have established our medical device design, development and manufacturing capabilities through internal projects and acquisitions over the past several years, with the goal of developing and commercializing at least 12 medical device products by the end of fiscal 2023 To that end, we have invested in state of the art R&D and manufacturing facilities in Ireland and the U.S. and are leveraging our balloon catheter, ultra thin walled catheter, thrombectomy and surface modification coating technologies to develop new product platforms and medical device products with a primary focus on treatment of peripheral artery disease ( PAD ). Our aim is to develop highly differentiated medical devices that address unmet clinical needs, improve patient outcomes and reduce procedure costs. We are also committed to developing or acquiring differentiated technology to support our medical device product development pipeline. In July 2019, the Company acquired an early stage device technology with multiple potential peripheral vascular applications. In May 2018, we acquired an innovative thrombectomy platform technology with broad potential applications in peripheral vascular and other areas. These acquisitions resulted in acquired in process R&D charges of $0.8 million and $7.9 million in fiscal 2019 and 2018, respectively. We plan to leverage our design, development and manufacturing capabilities to advance these acquired technology platforms for a variety of peripheral vascular applications as part of our whole product solutions strategy. Overview of Interventional Peripheral Market and Whole Product Solutions Strategy PAD is a condition that causes a narrowing of the blood vessels supplying the extremities, most often due to plaque buildup in the arterial walls. Left untreated, PAD may lead to symptoms such as large non healing ulcers, infections, or gangrene, and may require limb amputation or, in extreme cases, result in death. The American Heart Association has reported that an estimated 8.5 million Americans and 200 million people worldwide are living with PAD. The number of people affected by PAD is expected to increase as a result of an aging population, coupled with increasing prevalence of conditions linked to PAD, such as diabetes and obesity. The interventional PAD market utilizes a variety of access and therapy catheters to treat PAD. These technologies are delivered through a number of access points into the vascular system including femoral (leg), radial (wrist or arm) and pedal (foot). Our business model for our whole product solutions strategy is to design, develop and manufacture highly differentiated products that incorporate our proprietary catheter, balloon, thrombectomy and surface modification coating technologies to improve patient outcomes and reduce procedure costs, while maintaining patient safety. We are focused on developing devices that consider the needs of various care settings ranging from hospitals to alternate care facilities, in order to provide improved care. The strategy has been built on our investment in proprietary device technologies, as well as state of the art medical device design, development and manufacturing capabilities. Combined with our leadership in surface modification coating technologies, we are developing whole product solutions to address unmet needs in the treatment of PAD and other vascular diseases. Over the past several years we have made investments to enhance our clinical and regulatory capabilities and in fiscal 2020, we intend to make additional investments to obtain clinical data and drive clinician engagement with our products after approval. These investments are intended to reduce the time from product development to commercialization and ensure our products have clinician support and adoption. Our development efforts to date have yielded several device technology platforms that we anticipate will compete in the interventional vascular market, with a primary focus on treatment of PAD. 5 Drug coated balloons DCBs are currently used in a variety of vascular interventions and may be helpful in preventing restenosis, or the narrowing of vessels after treatment. Surmodics is focused on the development of DCB to treat PAD and the development of our SurVeil DCB to treat the superficial femoral artery over the past several years has been a major comp1nt of our whole product solutions strategy. During fiscal 2016, we initiated PREVEIL, an early feasibility clinical trial of the SurVeil DCB, which is intended to treat PAD in the leg above the knee. Enrollment in PREVEIL was completed in the second quarter of fiscal 2017 and the study met its primary endpoint by demonstrating peak paclitaxel plasma concentrations post index procedure. Consistent with pre clinical data, systemic levels were low and cleared rapidly. Data from the PREVEIL study continues to demonstrate positive results and showed no clinically driven target lesion revascularization after 12 months. We began enrollment in the TRANSCEND pivotal clinical trial for our SurVeil DCB in the first quarter of fiscal 2018, with the objective of obtaining data necessary to support regulatory approvals and reimbursement for this device in the U.S. as well as CE Mark approval. Until regulatory approvals have been obtained, our SurVeil DCB is not approved for commercial sale. In August 2019 we completed enrollment in TRANSCEND. On March 15, 2019, the United States Food and Drug Administration ( FDA ) issued a communication (the FDA communication ) to healthcare providers about the potential for increased long term mortality after use of paclitaxel coated balloons and paclitaxel eluting stents (collectively paclitaxel coated products ) to treat peripheral arterial disease ( PAD ) in the femoropopliteal artery. The FDA communication updated a previous notification from the FDA on the same topic, which was in response to meta analysis of randomized trials published in the Journal of the American Heart Association in December 2018. As a result of the FDA communication and the potential long term mortality signal related to the use of paclitaxel coated devices, the regulatory body with which we applied for a Conformit Europ enne Mark ( CE Mark ) to allow for commercialization of SurVeil in the European Union ( EU ) has notified us that they have temporarily paused review of submissions of paclitaxel coated devices. This pause and the current regulatory debate over paclitaxel coated devices have caused uncertainty regarding our goal of receiving a CE Mark by the end of calendar 2019 and subsequent commercialization of the product in fiscal 2020. As a result, we no longer expect revenue related to commercialization of this product in the EU or any associated milest1s in fiscal 2020. In fiscal 2018, we entered into an agreement with Abbott that provided Abbott with exclusive worldwide commercialization rights for the SurVeil DCB (the Abbott Agreement ). Pursuant to the terms of the Abbott Agreement, Surmodics received a $25 million upfront payment and a $10 million payment as a result of the completion of enrollment in the TRANSCEND trial. Separately, Abbott also received options to negotiate agreements for Surmodics' below the knee and arteriovenous ( AV ) fistula DCB products, which are currently in pre clinical development and a first in human clinical trial, respectively. We are collaborating with Abbott on product development, clinical trials and regulatory activities to obtain marketing clearances in the U.S. and the EU for the SurVeil DCB. Expenses related to these activities are primarily paid by Surmodics. In addition to the upfront and clinical trial milest1 payments received to date, we may earn up to an additional $57 million upon achievement of certain other milest1s related to regulatory approval and clinical trial activities. Upon the regulatory approval of the SurVeil DCB, Surmodics will be responsible for manufacturing clinical and commercial quantities of the product and will realize revenue from product sales to Abbott, as well as a share of profits resulting from sales to third parties. Our DCB product platform also includes our paclitaxel coated Avess DCB for the treatment of AV fistulae and our sirolimus coated Sundance DCB for the treatment of below the knee PAD, otherwise known as critical limb ischemia ( CLI ). We commenced and completed enrollment in a first in human clinical study of our Avess DCB in fiscal 2019. In fiscal 2019, we froze the design of our Sundance DCB and submitted an application for a first in human study of this device. We expect to commence this study in fiscal 2020. More than 35 million patients are estimated to be diagnosed with CLI in the U.S. by 2020. Rates of amputation and death are significant for CLI patients and there are currently no drug delivery devices approved to treat the condition in the U.S. In October 2019, the FDA designated the Sundance DCB as a Breakthrough Device under the FDA Breakthrough Devices Program. The program, launched in December 2018, is designed to streamline the market clearance approval process for products that have the potential to provide for more effective treatment or diagnosis of life threatening or irreversibly debilitating diseases or conditions. Radial access devices and other specialty catheters Often, interventional vascular procedures require 1 or more devices to provide appropriate access and necessary support for the physician. Our integration of proprietary low profile balloon catheter, ultra thin walled catheter, and surface modification coating technologies is generating a pipeline of highly differentiated medical devices that improve on currently available minimally invasive PAD treatments, or in some cases offer an option for complex cases. Our specialty catheters are designed for high performance in challenging vascular anatomy, providing clinicians enhanced ability to access, cross and treat increasingly complex vascular lesions. 6 We are developing a series of devices designed to provide radial (wrist) access to the peripheral vasculature . Radial artery access , which has already been widely adopted for coronary applications, offers many benefits relative to traditional femoral artery access . These benefits includ e reduced bleeding complications, earl ier ambulation and reduced length of stay and costs . We believe the integration of our catheter and coatings technologies will result in highly differentiated radial access devices intended to capture market share from standard femoral access devices . During fiscal 2019, we received FDA clearance for the Sublime guide sheath, designed to enable the delivery of lower extremity interventions from the radial artery. We expect to continue to develop and pursue clearance for other radial access devices in our fiscal 2020, including our Sublime radial access .014 PTA balloon catheter. Our specialty catheter portfolio has advanced with the execution of agreements with 2 leading, multi national medical device companies to distribute our Telemark coronary peripheral support microcatheter in the U.S. and Europe and our .014 and .018 low profile percutaneous transluminal angioplasty ( PTA ) balloon dilation catheters on a worldwide basis. We expect to commence commercial sales of each of these products through our distribution partners in fiscal 2020. Thrombectomy Acute vascular occlusion, or the blocking of arteries by clots or plaque is another peripheral vascular condition commonly associated with PAD. Often, these clots require surgical intervention and have proven difficult to remove with currently available medical device technologies. A similar condition in the venous system, known as Venous Thromboembolism ( VTE ), includes both pulmonary embolism and deep vein thrombosis. VTE has a high prevalence in the US and high overall and in hospital mortality rates which causes strain on the U.S. healthcare system. We are leveraging our proprietary Pounce thrombectomy platform technology to develop products to treat these conditions in a more effective, cost efficient manner. The Pounce technology is designed to remove difficult, organized (hard) blood clots that are often difficult for existing devices, and has potential applications in the peripheral vascular, neurology and coronary markets. The technology offers an innovative design that may reduce the need for the use of thrombolytics, lowering the likelihood of ICU time and bleeding complications that affect patient recovery and outcomes and increase the cost of treatment. Our goal with this technology is to reduce procedure time and eliminate the need for additional external capital equipment, thereby providing an easy to use, on the table solution for clinicians. We have submitted for FDA 510(k) clearance on our first Pounce thrombectomy device to treat vascular thrombosis and expect to receive clearance in fiscal 2020. Our goal is to expand our thrombectomy platform to include devices designed to treat deep vein thrombosis, as well as stroke and pulmonary embolism. Overview of Surmodics Surface Modification Coating Technologies We believe Surmodics is positi1d to take advantage of the continuing trend of incorporating surface modification coating technologies, particularly in the area of device drug delivery, into the design of more efficient and effective combination products, as well as new product applications. We have a growing proprietary technology portfolio that incorporates our market expertise and insight, as well as unique collaborative research, development and manufacturing capabilities key ingredients to bring innovation together to benefit patients and the healthcare industry. Coatings for Surface Modification and Device Drug Delivery Key differentiating characteristics of our coating platforms are their flexibility, durability and ease of use. In terms of flexibility, coatings can be applied to many different kinds of surfaces and can immobilize a variety of chemical, pharmaceutical and biological agents. Additionally, the surface modification process can be tailored to provide customers with the ability to improve their devices performance by choosing the specific coating properties desired for particular applications. Our surface modification coating technologies also can be combined to deliver multiple surface enhancing characteristics on the same device. Our proprietary PhotoLink coating technology ( PhotoLink Technology ) is a versatile, easily applied, coating technology that modifies medical device surfaces by creating covalent bonds between device surfaces and a variety of chemical agents. PhotoLink Technology can impart many performance enhancing characteristics, such as advanced lubricity (slippery) and hemocompatibility (preventing blood clot formation), when bound onto surfaces of medical devices or other biological materials without materially changing the dimensions or other physical properties of devices. PhotoLink Technology reagents can be applied to a variety of substrates. The coating formulations are easily applied to the material surface by a variety of methods including, but not limited to, dipping, spraying, roll coating or ink jetting. We continue to expand our proprietary reagent portfolio for use by our customers. These reagents enable our customers to develop novel surface 7 features for their devices, satisfying the expanding healthcare industry requirements. We are also continually working to expand the list of materials that are compatible with our surface modi fication and device drug delivery reagents. Additionally, we develop coating processes and coating equipment to meet the device quality, manufacturing throughput and cost requirements of our customers. The PhotoLink Technology coating process is relatively simple to use and is easily integrated into the customer manufacturing operations. In addition, the process does not subject the coated products to harsh chemical or temperature conditions, produces no hazardous byproducts, and does not require lengthy processing or curing time. Further, coatings incorporating the PhotoLink Technology are generally compatible with accepted sterilization processes, so the surface attributes are not lost when the medical device is sterilized. Our Serene hydrophilic coating platform optimizes lubricity and durability while significantly reducing particulates generation. This next generation, PhotoLink Technology enabled coating has demonstrated excellent lubricity on a wide range of substrates, and has been used on FDA cleared coronary, peripheral and structural heart devices. Our device drug delivery coating technologies allow therapeutic drugs to be incorporated within our proprietary polymer matrices to provide controlled, site specific release of the drug into the surrounding environment. The drug release can be tuned to elute quickly (within minutes to a few days) or slowly (from several months to over a year), illustrating the wide range of release profiles that can be achieved with our coating systems. On a wide range of devices, drug eluting coatings can help improve device performance, increase patient safety and enable innovative new treatments. Examples of short term use drug delivery devices would include DCB and examples of longer term drug delivery devices would include drug eluting stents. We work with companies in the medical device and biotechnology industries to develop specialized coatings that allow for the controlled release of drugs from device surfaces. We see at least 3 primary areas with strong future potential (1) improving the function of a device which itself is necessary to treat the medical condition; (2) enabling site specific drug delivery while limiting systemic exposure; and (3) enhancing the biocompatibility of a medical device to ensure that it continues to function over a long period of time. Licensing Arrangements We commercialize our surface modification coating technologies primarily through licensing arrangements with medical device manufacturers. We believe this approach allows us to focus our resources on further developing new technologies and expanding our licensing activities. Many of our technologies have been designed to allow manufacturers to implement them easily into their own manufacturing processes so customers can control production and quality internally without the need to send their products to a contract manufacturer. We generate the largest portion of our revenue through licensing arrangements. Royalties and license fees represented 48.4%, 436% and 435% of our total revenue in fiscal 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively. Revenue from these licensing arrangements typically includes license fees and milest1 payments, minimum royalties, and royalties based on a percentage of licensees product sales. We also generate revenue from reagent chemical or medical device product sales to licensees for use in their coating processes. Additionally, under the Abbott Agreement, we have provided worldwide commercialization rights, including a license under certain of our intellectual property, for our SurVeil DCB. During fiscal 2019 and 2018, we recognized license fee revenue of $135 million and $4.4 million related to the Abbott Agreement, which represents a portion of the up front license fee and strategic milest1 received under that agreement. The licensing process for our coating technology licenses begins with the customer specifying a desired product feature to be created such as lubricity or drug delivery. Because each device and coating application is unique, we routinely conduct a feasibility study to qualify each new potential product application, often generating commercial development revenue. Feasibility studies can range in duration from several months to a year. After we complete a feasibility study, our customers cannot market their product until they receive regulatory approval. As further described under the caption Government Regulation, the regulatory approval process varies in each country and ranges from several months to four or more years. At any time prior to a customer commercial launch, a license agreement may be executed granting the licensee rights to use our technology. We often support our customers by providing coating assistance for parts required in animal tests and human clinical trials. Typically, we complete a technology transfer to most customers which enables those customers to apply the coating at their own facilities. License agreement terms are generally for a specified number of years or our patent life, whichever is longer, although a license generally may be terminated by the licensee for any reason with advance written notice. In cases where the royalty obligation extends beyond the life of the applicable patent, it is because the license also includes rights to our know how or other proprietary rights. Under these circumstances, the royalty obligation typically continues at a reduced royalty rate for a specified number of years generally tied to the date on which the customer product was first sold. 8 Our license agreements may include certain license fees and or milest1 payments. Substantially all our licensed c oatings technology applications are n1xclusive, allowing us to license each technology to multiple customers. Moreover, even exclusive coatings technology licenses generally are limited to a specific field of use, allowing us the opportunity to further license technology to other customers. The royalty rate on a substantial number of the coatings agreements has traditionally been in the 2% to 3% range, but there are certain contracts with lower or higher rates. In certain agreements, our royalty is base d on an agreed upon amount per unit. License fees, milest1 payments, and the royalty rates are based on various factors, including the licensed product or technology stage of development, the perceived value of our technology to the customer produc t, the size of the potential market, and whether the arrangement is exclusive or n1xclusive. Our agreements often incorporate a minimum royalty to be paid by the licensee. Royalty payments generally commence 1 quarter after the customer actual produc t sales occur because of the delay in reporting sales by our licensees. As such, we historically recognized royalty revenue in the quarter that customer royalty payments were due to us. Commencing in fiscal 2019 we adopt ed the new revenue recognition accou nting standard under which we estimate and recognize sales based royalty revenue from our coating technology licens e es in the same quarter that the underlying customer product sale occurs. We have over 150 licensed product classes (customer products utilizing Surmodics technology) already in the market generating royalties and greater than 100 customer product classes incorporating our technology in various stages of pre commercialization. We signed 18, 13 and 17 new licenses in fiscal 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively. Under our coatings technology license agreements, the responsibility for securing regulatory approval for and ultimately commercializing these products rests with our customers. Our reliance on our customers in this regard and the potential risks to our operations as a result are discussed in Item 1A Risk Factors of this Form 10 K. Moreover, we are often contractually obligated to keep the details concerning our customers R&D efforts (including the timing of expected regulatory filings, approvals and market introductions) confidential. Our SurVeil DCB license requires us to complete certain activities in order to obtain regulatory approval for the device. Given the significant uncertainty inherent in product development and regulatory approval processes, the expected timing for regulatory approval and commercialization for the products pending regulatory approval can vary greatly. Our licensing agreements generally require us to keep our customers identities confidential, unless they approve of such disclosure. Licensed customers that allow the use of their name include Abbott Laboratories and Abbott Vascular, Inc. (together, Abbott ), Boston Scientific Corporation ( Boston Scientific ), Cook Medical, Cordis Corporation (a subsidiary of Cardinal Health, Inc.), Covidien PLC (a subsidiary of Medtronic), Edwards Lifesciences Corporation, Evalve, Inc. (a subsidiary of Abbott), ev3 Inc. (a subsidiary of Medtronic), Medtronic, OrbusNeich Medical, Inc., and Spectranetics Corporation (a subsidiary of Koninklijke Philips N.V.). IN VITRO DIAGNOSTICS SEGMENT The Surmodics In Vitro Diagnostics ( IVD ) business unit manufactures and sells comp1nts for in vitro diagnostic immunoassay and molecular tests and we sell these comp1nts to the diagnostic, biomedical research, and life science markets. These comp1nts include protein stabilizers, substrates, antigens, antibodies and surface coatings. Immunoassay Diagnostics. An immunoassay is a biochemical test that measures the presence or concentration of a target molecule, or analyte , in a biological fluid or sample. Analyte levels are correlated to the patient disease state or medical condition to diagnose the presence, absence or severity of disease. Analytes can range from large molecules such as proteins to small molecules such as horm1s. Immunoassays are developed and produced using multiple comp1nts. The comp1nt selection and optimization confer the assay quality and performance of the assay in terms of sensitivity and specificity. IVD companies select these critical biochemical and reagent comp1nts to meet the assay diagnostic specifications. We develop, manufacture and sell high performing, consistent quality and stable immunoassay comp1nt products to enable our customers diagnostic tests to detect the absence or presence of disease. 9 Molecular Diagnostics DNA and Protein Immobilization. Both DNA and protein microarrays are useful tools for the pharmaceutical, diagnostic and research industries. During a DNA gene analysis, typica lly thousands of different probes need to be placed in a pattern on a surface, called a DNA microarray. These microarrays are used by the pharmaceutical industry to screen for new drugs, by genome mappers to sequence human, animal or plant genomes, or by d iagnostic companies to search a patient sample for disease causing bacteria or viruses. However, DNA does not readily adhere to most surfaces. We have developed various surface chemistries for both DNA and protein immobilization. Protein microarrays are us ed as diagnostic and research tools to determine the presence and or quantity of proteins in a biological sample. The most common type of protein microarray is the antibody microarray, where antibodies are spotted onto a surface and used as capture molecul es for protein detection. The sales cycle for our IVD products generally begins when an IVD company initiates the process to develop a new, or improve a current, diagnostic test. During product development, these companies will look to source the test critical comp1nts with reagents it produces internally or with reagents from a supplier, such as Surmodics. As IVD tests are developed and various reagents are tested, companies will generally seek to optimize the sensitivity (false negative reductions), specificity (false positive reductions), speed (time from sample to results), convenience (ideally as few steps as possible) and cost effectiveness. Upon regulatory approval or clearance, the customer diagnostic test can be sold in the marketplace. It may take several years after approval or clearance for the test to achieve peak market share and optimize Surmodics revenue. Overview of In Vitro Diagnostics Products Protein Stabilizers. We offer a full line of stabilization products for the IVD market. These products increase sensitivity, reduce false positive and false negative results, while extending the diagnostic test shelf life, thereby producing more consistent assay results. Our stabilization products are ready to use, eliminating the in house manufacturing preparation time and cost of producing stabilization and blocking reagents. Substrates. We also provide colorimetric and chemiluminescent substrates to the IVD market under our BioFX trademark. A substrate is the diagnostic test kit comp1nt that detects and signals that a reaction has taken place so that a result can be recorded. Colorimetric substrates signal a positive diagnostic result through a color change. Chemiluminescent substrates signal a positive diagnostic result by emitting light. We believe that our substrates offer a high level of stability, sensitivity and consistency. Antigens and Antibodies. Antigens and Antibodies. We are the exclusive distributor in the U.S., Canada and Puerto Rico (and non exclusive distributor in Japan) of DIARECT AG line of antigens and antibodies. DIARECT produces the majority of these antigens and antibodies using recombinant technology. Surface Coatings for Molecular Diagnostic Applications. We offer custom coatings for molecular diagnostic applications, including DNA, RNA and protein microarrays. Our TRIDIA surface coatings bind molecules to a variety of surfaces and geometries and may be customized for selectivity using passivating polymers and reactive groups. This proprietary technology immobilizes DNA and protein to adhere to testing surfaces. We offer other surface coatings that improve flow characteristics through membranes and microfluidic channels on diagnostic devices including point of care comp1nts. 10 OTHER FACTORS IMPACTING OUR OPERATIONS Research and Development Our R&D personnel work to enhance and expand our technology and product offerings in the area of whole product solutions, drug delivery, surface modification, and IVD through internal scientific investigation and proprietary product development. These scientists and engineers also evaluate external technologies in support of our corporate development activities. Our R&D efforts are all guided by the needs of the markets in which we do business. Additionally, the R&D staff support the business development staff and business units in performing feasibility studies, and providing technical assistance to existing and potential customers. These services, which generate our research, development and other revenue, include optimizing the relevant technologies for specific customer applications, supporting clinical trials, training customers, and integrating our technologies and know how into customer manufacturing operations and developing whole product solutions that meet customers needs by integrating our coating, medical device and medical device delivery technologies. In fiscal 2019, 2018 and 2017, our R&D expenses were $529 million, $410 million and $318 million, respectively. R&D expenses are primarily comprised of research, development, clinical and regulatory activities necessary to design, develop and commercialize our products, as well as costs associated with our research, development and other revenue. We intend to continue investing significantly in R&D to advance our medical device platform technologies, surface modification coatings, device drug delivery and in vitro diagnostic technologies and to expand uses for our technology platforms. We anticipate R&D expenses will continue to be significant in fiscal 2020, primarily related to medical device product development, including our DCB development and related clinical study activities. In addition, we continue to pursue access to products and technologies developed outside the Company to complement our DCB, radial access and or thrombectomy platforms. Medical Device Segment As treatment technologies become more sophisticated and increasingly leverage minimally invasive techniques, we believe the need for improved medical devices that benefit from surface modification and device drug delivery will continue to grow. We intend to continue our development efforts to expand our proprietary medical device offerings, including advancing our surface modification and device drug delivery technologies to better meet these needs across multiple medical markets and to capture more of the final product value. Our medical device product development and clinical activities are primarily focused on the peripheral vascular market, where we believe the integration of our surface modification, balloon catheter, thrombectomy and ultra thin walled catheter technologies will result in unique devices capable of producing better patient outcomes in complex, difficult to treat arterial disease cases. Our product pipeline continues to be bolstered through developing and acquiring medical device technologies and funding development activities, which has included pre clinical and clinical studies. In fiscal 2019, we acquired an early stage technology to complement our pipeline of medical devices for treatment of PAD. This acquisition, along with our fiscal 2018 acquisition of a thrombectomy device technology as well as our significant investments in our R&D infrastructure, facilities and personnel over the past several years, reflect our ongoing commitment to strengthen our proprietary product pipeline and broaden our capacity for medical device R&D activities. In fiscal 2018, we completed the build out of an R&D focused facility which we lease in Eden Prairie, Minnesota. This accomplishment brought together the development teams focused on our DCB, catheter, and thrombectomy platform technologies, as well as our internal regulatory team, in a state of the art R&D facility in order to provide synergies and development efficiencies. Our facility in Ballinasloe, Ireland is focused on the design and manufacture of balloon based peripheral vascular devices. This facility capabilities include balloon forming, extrusion, coating, braiding and assembly of finished products, with sufficient space for future growth. In fiscal 2017, we completed an expansion of R&D and manufacturing clean rooms as well as an analytical lab to support our whole product solutions strategy. We have continued to develop surface modification coating and DCB chemistry technologies in our Eden Prairie, Minnesota facilities. Our proprietary, whole product solutions integrate our surface modification coatings, catheter, thrombectomy and balloon technologies and are being developed with a combined team from our U.S. and Irish facilities. In addition to our DCB platform products, we are executing on our plan to develop and commercialize at least 12 medical device products by the end of fiscal 2023 Additional planned activities include incorporation of our catheter and thrombectomy technology platforms into various other devices intended for the emerging peripheral vascular treatment market as well as initiation of surface modification experiments that improve medical device performance. In addition to proprietary medical device product development, we work with our customers to integrate the best possible surface modification and device drug delivery technologies with their products, not only to meet their performance requirements, but also to perform services quickly so that the product may reach the market ahead of the competition. To quickly solve problems that might arise during the development and optimization process, we offer extensive capabilities in analytical chemistry and surface characterization within our R&D organization. Our state of the art instrumentation and extensive experience allow us to test the purity of coating reagents, to monitor the elution rate of drug from coatings, to measure coating thickness and smoothness, and to map the distribution of chemicals throughout coatings. We believe our capabilities in this area exceed those of our competitors. 11 In Vitro Diagnostics Segment Our R&D efforts to grow our IVD business unit include identifying and addressing unmet needs that exist in the global IVD marketplace. Our pipeline of IVD products includes comp1nts for immunoassay and molecular diagnostic applications, such as, new protein stabilizers, detection technologies, accessory reagents and surface coatings that have the potential to add greater sensitivity, specificity, speed, convenience and lower cost for IVD test manufacturers. Clinical Trials For our DCB products, which combine a pharmaceutical drug with a medical device, clinical studies are required in order for us to obtain regulatory approval or clearance. Each clinical trial includes a primary endpoint or endpoints, which measure effectiveness and or safety of a device based on the product ability to achieve a pre specified outcome or outcomes and is selected based on the proposed intended use of the medical device. A pivotal trial is a definitive study designed to gather evidence to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of a product prior to its marketing. The following is a summary of our significant clinical trial activities over the past 3 years. In the second quarter of fiscal 2017 we completed enrollment in our PREVEIL first in human early feasibility study using the SurVeil DCB. Twelve month results from PREVEIL indicated that acute success measures of safety were achieved in all patients, as well as 100 percent freedom from clinically driven target lesion revascularization. In July 2017, we received an investigational device exemption ( IDE ) from the FDA to initiate a pivotal clinical trial of the SurVeil DCB. Enrollment in our randomized clinical trial, TRANSCEND, began in fiscal 2018 and was completed in August 2019. The TRANSCEND trial will provide the data necessary to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of our SurVeil DCB compared with the Medtronic IN.PACT Admiral DCB in treating PAD in the upper leg. The trial enrolled 446 subjects at 65 global sites. The trial primary efficacy endpoint is primary patency, defined as a composite of freedom from restenosis and clinically driven target lesion revascularization through 12 months post index procedure. All randomized subjects will be followed through 60 months post index procedure. If successful, the TRANSCEND clinical trial data will be used to support regulatory approvals and reimbursement in the U.S. and Europe. There is no assurance that the TRANSCEND clinical trial will support regulatory approval, or that any anticipated time frame will be met. We estimate that the total cost of the TRANSCEND clinical trial will range between $35 million to $40 million from inception to completion . In December 2018, we commenced a first in human clinical study of our Avess DCB for treatment of AV fistulae, commonly associated with hemodialysis. We completed enrollment in this 12 patient study in fiscal 2019 and expect to receive safety and efficacy data to support application for a pivotal trial in fiscal 2020. In September 2019, we submitted an application for a first in human study of our Sundance DCB for treatment of PAD below the knee. We expect this study will commence in fiscal 2020. Patents and Proprietary Rights Patents and other forms of proprietary rights are an essential part of Surmodics business. The Company aggressively pursues patent protection covering the proprietary technologies that we consider strategically important to our business. In addition to seeking patent protection in the U.S., we also generally file patent applications in European countries and, on a selective basis, other foreign countries. We strategically manage our patent portfolio so as to ensure that we have valid and enforceable patent rights protecting our technological innovations. We protect our extensive portfolio of technologies through filing and maintaining patent rights covering a variety of coatings, drug delivery methods, reagents, and formulations, as well as particular clinical device applications. As of September 30, 2019, Surmodics owned or had exclusive rights to 55 pending U.S. patent applications and 148 foreign patent applications. Likewise, as of the same date, Surmodics owned or had exclusive rights to 141 issued U.S. patents and 196 international patents. We have licensed our PhotoLink Technology on a non exclusive basis to a number of our customers for use in a variety of medical device surface applications, including those described above. In particular, we have 28 issued U.S. patents, 9 pending U.S. patent applications, 51 issued international patents, and 23 pending international patent applications protecting various aspects of these technologies, including compositions, methods of manufacture and methods of coating devices. The expiration dates for these patents and anticipated expiration dates of the patent applications range from fiscal 2020 to 2035. Moreover, these patents and patent applications represent distinct families, with each family generally covering a successive generation of the technology, including improvements that enhance coating performance, manufacturability, or other important features desired by our customers. Among these, our fourth generation of our PhotoLink technology is protected by a family of patents that will expire in 12 early fiscal 2020. As noted above in Licensing Arrangements, the royalty obligation in our typical license agreement is generally for a specified number of years or the patent life, whichever is longer. In cases where the royalty obligation extends beyond the life of the applicable patent, it is because the license also includes rights to our know how or other proprietary rights. Under these circumstances, the royalty obligation will continue at a reduced royalty rate for a specified number o f years, as determined based on the specific terms and conditions of the applicable customer agreement, generally tied to the date on which the customer product was first sold. In recent years, we have successfully converted a number of our customers pr oducts utilizing this and other early generation coating technologies to our advanced generation technologies , or extended the royalty bearing term of their existing technology licenses. Royalty revenue associated with our fourth generation PhotoLink Technologies was approximately 21% of our consolidated revenue for each of the years ended September 30, 2019, 2018 and 2017. In most of the license agreements covering our hydrophilic coating technologies, the customer royalty obligations extend, at a reduced rate, beyond expiration of the applicable patent(s) as a result of know how and other proprietary rights licensed under the agreements. We also rely upon trade secrets, trademarks and other un patented proprietary technologies. We seek to maintain the confidentiality of such information by requiring employees, consultants and other parties to sign confidentiality agreements and by limiting access by parties outside the Company to such information. There can be no assurance, however, that these measures will prevent the unauthorized disclosure or use of this information, or that others will not be able to independently develop such information. Additionally, there can be no assurance that any agreements regarding confidentiality and non disclosure will not be breached, or, in the event of any breach, that adequate remedies would be available to us. Marketing and Sales Through our whole product solutions strategy, we utilize our design, development, manufacturing and regulatory capabilities to provide our customers access to highly differentiated products that address important unmet clinical needs. While medical device product development and manufacturing capability and capacity scale up have been a significant focus over the past several years, we continue to provide world class surface modification coating technologies to our medical device customers and sales of our hydrophilic coating reagents and related sales based royalties continue to account for the majority of the revenue from our Medical Device segment. For our whole product solutions, we have focused on negotiating license and distribution agreements with our customers that call for revenue from product sales at a specified transfer price and, in certain cases, license fees and sales based royalties. As we continue to develop and seek regulatory approval for our proprietary medical device products, we expect the majority of revenue growth in the Medical Device business to come from these products. Sales and marketing professionals working within our Medical Device business work in concert with our R&D personnel to coordinate commercialization activities for both our surface modification coatings and medical device products. Our sales professionals specialization fosters an in depth knowledge of the issues faced by our customers, such as industry trends, technology changes, biomaterial changes and the regulatory environment. We have signed agreements with third party distributors to bring our first cleared proprietary medical device products to the market, which we expect to occur in fiscal 2020. Following receipt of 510(k) clearance or CE Mark, we conduct clinical evaluations of our proprietary medical device products in order to generate clinical data and receive important feedback regarding the attributes and performance of our devices from physicians. These evaluations allow us to build the value proposition for each of our products to support successful commercialization. With respect to our diagnostics products, our sales professionals sell directly to IVD kit manufacturers and we enter into supply agreements with third parties to distribute those products around the world. We also offer diagnostics products for sale through our website. To support our marketing and sales activities, we publish technical literature on our various surface modification, drug delivery, and IVD technologies and products. In addition, we exhibit at major trade shows and technical meetings, advertise in selected trade journals and through our website, and conduct direct mailings to appropriate target markets. We also offer ongoing customer service and technical support to our customers. This service and support may begin with a feasibility study, and also may include additional services such as assistance in the transfer of the technology to the customer, further optimization, process control and troubleshooting, preparation of product for clinical studies, and assistance with regulatory submissions for product approval. Some of these services are billable to customers, mainly feasibility and optimization activities. 13 Significant Customers Revenue from Abbott and Medtronic represented approximately 19% and 14%, respectively, of our consolidated revenue for the year ended September 30, 2019. Revenue from these customers was generated from multiple products and fields of use, including revenue from the Abbott Agreement, substantially all of which were recognized in our Medical Device segment. No other customer provided more than 6% of our consolidated revenue in fiscal 2019. 2 customers in our IVD business accounted for 19% and 13%, respectively, of our IVD operating segment revenue. Competition Medical Device Segment We believe that the intense competition within the medical device market creates opportunities for our technologies as medical device manufacturers seek to differentiate their products through new enhancements or to remain competitive with enhancements offered by other manufacturers. Our PTA balloon catheter and microcatheter products compete with larger original equipment manufacturer ( OEM ) suppliers, as well as some of our largest medical device customers. We provide differentiated whole product solutions that integrate our surface modification, catheter, balloon and other proprietary technologies. We believe our whole product solutions will be competitive on the basis of their safety and efficacy as a result of the innovative design and differentiated coating and device design technology, which will lead to demonstrated improvements in patient outcomes through reduced invasiveness compared to other devices used for comparable procedures. Because a significant portion of our revenue depends on royalties derived from our customers medical device product sales incorporating our surface modification coating technologies, we are also affected by competition within the markets for such devices. As we typically license our surface modification coating technologies on a non exclusive basis, we benefit by offering our technologies to multiple competing manufacturers of a device. However, competition in the medical device market could also have an adverse effect on us. While we seek to license our coatings products to established manufacturers, in certain cases, our surface modification licensees may compete directly with larger, dominant manufacturers with extensive product lines and greater sales, marketing and distribution capabilities. We also are unable to control other factors that may impact commercialization of our whole product solutions and licensees with medical devices that utilize our surface modification coatings, such as regulatory approval, marketing and sales efforts of our customers and licensees or competitive pricing pressures within the particular market. Many of our existing and potential competitors have greater financial, technical and marketing resources than we have. The ability for surface modification coating technologies to improve the performance of medical devices and drugs and to enable new product categories has resulted in increased competition in these markets. Some of our competitors offer device drug delivery technologies, while others specialize in lubricious or hemocompatible coating technology. Some of these companies target cardiovascular, peripheral or other medical device applications. In addition, because of the many product possibilities afforded by surface modification coating technologies, many of the large medical device manufacturers have developed, or are engaged in efforts to develop, internal competency in the area of surface modification, including drug delivery technologies. We attempt to differentiate ourselves from our competitors by providing what we believe is a high value added approach to device, drug delivery and surface modification coating technologies. We believe that the primary factors customers consider in choosing a particular technology include performance (e.g., flexibility, ability to fine tune drug elution profiles, biocompatibility), ease of manufacturing, time to market, intellectual property protection, ability to produce multiple products from a single process, compliance with manufacturing regulations, ability to manufacture clinical and commercial products, customer service and total cost of goods (including manufacturing process labor). We believe our technologies deliver exceptional performance in these areas, allowing us to compete favorably with respect to these factors. With respect to our licensed surface modification coating technologies, we believe that the cost and time required to obtain the necessary regulatory approvals significantly reduces the likelihood of a customer changing the manufacturing process it uses once a device or drug has been approved for sale. In Vitro Diagnostics Segment Competition in the diagnostics market is highly fragmented. In the product lines in which we compete (protein stabilization reagents, substrates, antigens and surface chemistry technologies), we face an array of competitors ranging from large manufacturers with multiple business lines to small manufacturers that offer a limited selection of products. Some of our competitors have substantially more capital resources, marketing experience, R&D resources and production facilities than we do. We believe that our products compete on performance, stability (shelf life), sensitivity (lower levels detected, faster results), consistency and price. We believe that our continued competitive success will depend on our ability to gain market share, to develop 14 or acquire new proprietary products, obtain patent or other protection for our products and successfully market our products directly or through partners. Manufacturing We manufacture our surface modification and drug delivery reagents and our IVD products in 1 of our Eden Prairie, Minnesota facilities. In certain limited circumstances, we also provide contract manufacturing services for our customers, including, for example, coating their medical devices that are intended for pre clinical and clinical development (including human clinical trials), and products that are sold for commercial use by our customers. We manufacture PTA balloon catheters and microcatheters in our Ballinasloe, Ireland facility, which offers a suite of capabilities, including balloon forming, extrusion, coating, braiding and assembly of finished products. We plan to manufacture substantially all of our whole product solutions devices in our Ireland facility as the products are launched. Our SurVeil DCB is currently manufactured in 1 of our Eden Prairie, Minnesota facilities as we scale up our Irish facility for DCB manufacturing. We will maintain secondary, redundant manufacturing capacity in our U.S. facilities once full scale up has been achieved in our Ireland facility. We attempt to maintain multiple sources of supply for the key raw materials used to manufacture our products. We do, however, purchase some raw materials from single sources, but we believe that additional sources of supply are readily available. Further, to the extent additional sources of supply are not readily available, we believe that we could manufacture such raw materials. We follow quality management procedures in accordance with applicable regulations and guidance for the development and manufacture of materials and device, biotechnology or combination products that support clinical trials and commercialization. In order to meet our customers needs in this area, our manufacturing facility in Eden Prairie, Minnesota is certified to ISO 13485 and ISO 9001 Our manufacturing facility in Ballinasloe, Ireland is certified to ISO 13485. Each of these facilities is registered with the U.S. FDA as a Contract Manufacturer. Government Regulation Our medical device products and the IVD, third party device and biotechnology products incorporating our technologies are often required to undergo long, expensive and uncertain regulatory review processes that are governed by the U.S. FDA and other international regulatory authorities. Our strategy for our proprietary medical device products is to obtain regulatory clearance in the U.S and European Union. New medical devices can only be marketed in the U.S. after a pre market notification for 510(k) clearance or a pre market approval ( PMA ) by the FDA. These processes can take anywhere from several months (e.g., for medical device products seeking regulatory approval under the 510(k) clearance process) to several years (e.g., for medical device products seeking regulatory approval under the PMA application process). In the European Union, regulatory approval is signified by the CE Mark, which is generally granted by 1 of the competent authorities and is based on the submission of a design dossier, a manufacturer validation assessment, a third party assessment, and review of the design dossier by a Notified Body. In 2017, the European Union authorized new medical device regulation. The new regulation, which will impose significant additional pre market and post market requirements, becomes effective for devices submitted for CE Mark after May 2020. Medical devices granted CE Mark prior to May 2020 will require recertification based on the new requirements within five years after the effective date. With respect to our customers products that incorporate our surface modification coating and IVD technologies, the burden of securing regulatory approval typically rests with our customers as the medical device manufacturers. With respect to our whole product solutions, including the SurVeil DCB, our other DCB platform devices and any additional medical device products that we develop, the burden of securing regulatory approval will rest on us unless we partner with other organizations to pursue such approval. In support of our customers and our own regulatory filings, we maintain various confidential Device Master Files with the FDA and provide technical information to other regulatory agencies outside the U.S. regarding the nature, chemical structure and biocompatibility of our reagents. Our licensees generally do not have direct access to these files. However, they may, with our permission, reference these files in their various regulatory submissions to these agencies. This approach allows regulatory agencies to understand the details of our technologies without our having to share this highly confidential information with our customers. U.S. legislation allows companies, prior to obtaining FDA clearance or approval to market a medical product in the U.S., to manufacture medical products in the U.S. and export them for sale in international markets. This generally allows us to realize earned royalties so1r, and may result in opportunities to market our whole product solutions in other countries. However, sales 15 of med ical products outside the U.S. are subject to international requirements that vary from country to country. The time required to obtain approval for sale internationally may be longer or shorter than that required by the FDA. Employees As of November 30, 2019, we had 369 employees. Of these employees we employ 151 outside the U.S., primarily in R&D and manufacturing operations functions. We are not a party to any collective bargaining agreements. EXECUTIVE OFFICERS OF THE REGISTRANT As of November 30, 2019, the names, ages and positions of the Company executive officers are as follows Name Age Position Gary R. Maharaj 56 President and Chief Executive Officer Timothy J. Arens 52 Vice President of Finance and Chief Financial Officer Thomas A. Greaney 53 Chief Operating Officer, Medical Devices Charles W. Olson 55 Senior Vice President of Commercial and Business Development, Medical Devices Bryan K. Phillips 48 Senior Vice President, Legal, Human Resources and Information Systems, General Counsel and Secretary Teryl L.W. Sides 50 Senior Vice President and Chief Marketing Officer Joseph J. Stich 54 Vice President and General Manager, In Vitro Diagnostics Gregg S. Sutton 60 Vice President, Research and Development, Medical Devices Gary R. Maharaj joined the Company in December 2010 as President and Chief Executive Officer and was also appointed to the Surmodics Board of Directors at such time. Prior to joining Surmodics, Mr. Maharaj served as President and Chief Executive Officer of Arizant Inc., a provider of patient temperature management systems in hospital operating rooms, from 2006 to 2010. Previously, Mr. Maharaj served in several senior level management positions for Augustine Medical, Inc. (predecessor to Arizant Inc.) from 1996 to 2006, including Vice President of Marketing, and Vice President of Research and Development. During his 36 years in the medical device industry, Mr. Maharaj has also served in various management and research positions for the orthopedic implant and rehabilitation divisions of Smith & Nephew, PLC. Timothy J. Arens joined the Company in February 2007 as Director, Business Development and became Senior Director of Financial Planning and Analysis and General Manager, In Vitro Diagnostics in October 2010. He was promoted to Vice President of Finance and Interim Chief Financial Officer in August 2011 and in February 2013 became Vice President Corporate Development and Strategy. In May 2018, Mr. Arens was named interim Vice President of Finance and Chief Financial Officer for a second time and in February 2019 he was named Vice President of Finance and Chief Financial Officer. Prior to joining Surmodics, Mr. Arens was employed at St. Jude Medical, Inc., a medical technology company, from 2003 to 2007, in positions of increasing responsibility related to business development and strategic planning functions. Thomas A. Greaney joined the Company in November 2015 as Vice President of Operations and General Manager of Creagh Medical, after we acquired it. In August 2017, Mr. Greaney was promoted to Chief Operating Officer, Medical Devices. Prior to joining Surmodics, he served as Chief Executive Officer for Creagh Medical, from September 2005 to November 2015. Prior to his tenure in Creagh Medical, Mr. Greaney served in a variety of roles with Boston Scientific for 10 years including the world wide operations responsibility for the Taxus Stent commercialization. From 1989 to 1995, he worked for a number of Electronics companies in a variety of engineering and management roles. Charles W. Olson joined the Company in July 2001 as Market Development Manager, was promoted in December 2002 to Director, Business Development, named General Manager of the Hydrophilic Technologies business unit in April 2004, and promoted to Vice President and General Manager, Hydrophilic Technologies in October 2004. In April 2005, the position of Vice President, Sales was added to his responsibilities. In November 2008, Mr. Olson was named Vice President of our Cardiovascular business unit, in October 2010, he was named Senior Vice President and General Manager, Medical Device, and in August 2016 he was named Senior Vice President of Commercial and Business Development, Medical Devices. Prior to joining Surmodics, Mr. Olson was employed as General Manager at Minnesota Extrusion from 1998 to 2001 and at Lake Region Manufacturing in project management and technical sales from 1993 to 1998. 16 Bryan K. Phillips joined the Company in July 2005 as Patent Counsel and Assistant General Counsel. In January 2006, Mr. Phillips was appointed Corporate Secretary, and he was promoted to Deputy General Counsel in Oct ober 2007. He was promoted to Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary in September 2008 and was promoted to Senior Vice President in October 2010. In August 2011, he became Senior Vice President, Legal and Human Resources, General Counsel a nd Secretary. Prior to joining Surmodics, Mr. Phillips served as patent counsel at Guidant Corporation Cardiac Rhythm Management Group where he was responsible for developing and implementing intellectual property strategies and also for supporting the c ompany business development function. He also practiced law at the Minneapolis based law firm of Merchant & Gould P.C. On November 8, 2019, Mr. Phillips notified the Company of his intention to resign from his positions with the Company. In order to assu re an orderly transition of his responsibilities, Mr. Phillips will provide transitional services to the Company through December 20, 2019. Teryl L.W. Sides joined the Company in November 2018 as Senior Vice President and Chief Marketing Officer. Before joining Surmodics, Ms. Sides served as Founder and Chief Executive Officer of Projectory, a consulting firm that provides strategic marketing services to med tech clients, ranging from start ups to global businesses, from 2011 to 2018. Prior to joining Projectory, Ms. Sides was the Vice President of Marketing and Product Development for Arizant, Inc. from 1998 to 2011 Joseph J. Stich joined the Company in March 2010 as Vice President of Marketing, Corporate Development and Strategy. In August 2011, he became Vice President, Business Operations and General Manager, In Vitro Diagnostics and in September 2013 his role was adjusted to Vice President and General Manager, In Vitro Diagnostics. Before joining Surmodics, Mr. Stich was Vice President of Corporate Development for Abraxis BioScience, LLC, a biotechnology company focused on oncology therapeutics, from 2009 to 2010. Prior to joining Abraxis, he was a Vice President for MGI Pharma, Inc., a biopharmaceutical company, from 2005 to 2009. Mr. Stich prior experience also includes serving as President COO of Pharmaceutical Corp. of America (a subsidiary of Publicis Healthcare Specialty Group), and positions of increasing responsibility in sales and marketing at Sanofi Aventis Pharmaceuticals. Gregg S. Sutton joined the Company in January 2016 as Vice President of Research and Development, Medical Devices. Prior to joining Surmodics, he served as President and CEO of NorMedix, Inc., which we acquired in fiscal 2016, since June 2009. Mr. Sutton is a veteran medical device designer and developer with over 25 years of engineering experience in the medical device industry. He co founded and held executive positions at several highly successful, early stage development device companies, including Atritech, Angioguard, Vascular Solutions, and Navarre Biomedical, leading teams in development and launch of high profile, first of their kind devices. The executive officers of the Company are elected by and serve at the discretion of the Board of Directors. N1 of our executive officers are related to any other executive officer or any of our directors. 17 ITEM 1A. RI SK FACTORS . RISKS RELATING TO OUR BUSINESS, STRATEGY AND INDUSTRY The loss of, or significant reduction in business from, 1 or more of our major customers could significantly reduce our revenue, earnings or other operating results. A significant portion of our revenue is derived from a relatively small number of customers. 2 of our customers provided more than 10% of our revenue in fiscal 2019. Revenue from Abbott and Medtronic represented approximately 19% and 14%, respectively of our total revenue for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2019 and was generated from multiple products and fields of use. The loss of Medtronic, Abbott or any of our largest customers, or reductions in business from them, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations, and cash flow. There can be no assurance that revenue from any customer will continue at their historical levels. If we cannot broaden our customer base, we will continue to depend on a small number of customers for a significant portion of our revenue. The long term success of our business may suffer if we are unable to expand our licensing base. We intend to continue pursuing a strategy of licensing our coatings technologies to a diverse array of medical device companies, thereby expanding the commercialization opportunities for our technologies. A significant, albeit declining portion of our revenue is derived from customer devices used in connection with procedures in cardiovascular, peripheral vascular, neurovascular and other applications. As a result, our business is susceptible to adverse trends in procedures. Further, we may also be subject to adverse trends in specific markets such as the cardiovascular industry, including declines in procedures using our customers products as well as declines in average selling prices from which we earn royalties. Our success will depend, in part, on our ability to attract new licensees, to enter into agreements for additional applications with existing licensees and to develop technologies for use in new applications. There can be no assurance that we will be able to identify, develop and adapt our technologies for new applications in a timely and cost effective manner; that new license agreements will be executed on terms favorable to us; that new applications will be accepted by customers in our target markets; or that products incorporating newly licensed technology, including new applications, will gain regulatory approval, be commercialized or gain market acceptance. Delays or failures in these efforts could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition and operating results. Surface modification, device drug delivery and medical device products are competitive markets and carry the risk of technological obsolescence and we face increased competition in our In Vitro Diagnostics segment. We operate in a competitive and evolving field, and new developments are expected to continue at a rapid pace. Our success depends, in part, upon our ability to maintain a competitive position in the development of technologies and products in the field of surface modification and device drug delivery. Our surface modification coating technologies compete with technologies developed by a number of other companies. In addition, many medical device manufacturers have developed, or are engaged in efforts to develop surface modification coating technologies for use on their own products, particularly in the area of drug delivery. With respect to commercialization of our whole product solutions, we have faced, and expect to continue to face, competitive pricing pressures from larger OEM suppliers, as well as some of our largest medical device partners that have in house resources that produce similar products. Some of our existing and potential competitors (especially medical device manufacturers pursuing coating solutions through their own R&D efforts) have greater financial and technical resources as well as production and marketing capabilities than us. Further, even if we are successful with respect to our plan to develop at least 12 medical device products over the next four years, the commercialization of these products is currently dependent upon a commercial partner to effectively market and sell our products to end users. Competitors may succeed in developing competing technologies or obtaining governmental approval for products before us. Products incorporating our competitors technologies may gain market acceptance more rapidly than products using our technologies. Furthermore, there can be no assurance that new products or technologies developed by others, or the emergence of new industry standards, will not render our products or technologies or licensees products incorporating our technologies uncompetitive or obsolete. Any new technologies that make our surface modification coating, medical device platforms or In Vitro Diagnostics technologies less competitive or obsolete would have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We may not be successful in implementing our whole product solutions strategy and related important strategic initiatives Since fiscal 2013, with our investment in our DCB platform, we have been focused on a key growth strategy for our Medical Device business by expanding to offer whole product solutions to our medical device customers. Our aim is to provide customers with highly differentiated products that address unmet clinical needs, and partner with them on successful commercialization. If we are unable to identify and enter into arrangements with our medical device customers for the commercialization of our products on acceptable terms, we may seek to market and sell these products through third party distributors or via direct sales. 18 Successfully implementing our whole product solutions strategy and related s trategic initiatives will place substantial demands on our resources and require, among other things continued enhancement of our medical device R&D capabilities, including those needed to support the clinical evaluation and regulatory approval for our whole product solutions; effective coordination and integration of our research facilities and teams, particularly those located in different facilities; successful hiring and training of personnel; effective management of a business geographically located both in the U.S. and Ireland; commercialization of our products, including through strategic partnerships with our medical device customers, third party distributors, or via direct sales; commitment from our medical device customers to market our products effectively or to devote resources necessary to provide effective sales; sufficient liquidity to support substantial investments in R&D required to make our strategy successful; and increased marketing and sales support activities. There is no assurance that we will be able to successfully implement our whole product strategy and related strategic initiatives in accordance with our expectations, which could impact our ability to realize an acceptable return on the investments we are making in connection with this strategy, and may result in an adverse impact on our business and financial results. Failure to identify acquisition opportunities or to integrate acquired businesses or technologies into our operations successfully may limit our growth. An important part of our growth in the future may involve the acquisition of complementary businesses or technologies. Our identification of suitable acquisition candidates involves risks inherent in assessing the technology, value, strengths, weaknesses, overall risks and profitability, if any, of acquisition candidates. We may not be able to identify suitable acquisition candidates, or we may be unable to execute acquisitions due to competition from buyers with more resources. If we do not make suitable investments and acquisitions, we may find it more difficult to realize our growth objectives. The process of integrating acquired businesses into our operations poses numerous risks, including an inability to integrate acquired operations, personnel, technology, information systems, and internal control systems and products; diversion of management attention, including the need to manage several remote locations with a limited management team; difficulties and uncertainties in transitioning the customers or other business relationships from the acquired entity to us; and the loss of key employees of acquired companies. In addition, future acquisitions may be dilutive to our shareholders ownership and or cause large 1 time expenses or create goodwill or other intangible assets that could result in future significant asset impairment charges. In addition, if we acquire entities that have not yet commercialized products but rather are developing technologies for future commercialization, our earnings per share may fluctuate as we expend significant funds for continued R&D efforts necessary to commercialize such acquired technology. We cannot guarantee that we will be able to successfully complete any acquisitions or that we will realize any anticipated benefits from acquisitions that we complete. Our failure to expand our management systems and controls to support anticipated growth or integrate acquisitions could seriously harm our operating results and business. Our operations are expanding, and we expect this trend to continue as we execute our business strategy. Executing our business strategy has placed significant demands on management and our administrative, development, operational, information technology, manufacturing, financial and personnel resources. Accordingly, our future operating results will depend on the ability of our officers and other key employees to continue to implement and improve our operational, development, customer support and financial control systems, and effectively expand, train and manage our employee base. Otherwise, we may not be able to manage our growth successfully. 19 Goodwill or other assets on our balance sheet may become impaired, which could have a material adverse effect on our operating results. We have a significant amount of goodwill and intangible assets on our balance sheet in connection with our acquisitions. As of September 30, 2019, we had $26.1 million of goodwill and indefinite lived intangible assets on our consolidated balance sheet related to our Medical Device and IVD segments, of which $18.1 million related to our Medical Device reporting unit. As required by the accounting guidance for non amortizing intangible assets, we evaluate at least annually the potential impairment of the goodwill and trademark. Testing for impairment of non amortizing intangible assets involves the determination of the fair value of our reporting units. The estimation of fair values involves a high degree of judgment and subjectivity in the assumptions used. We also evaluate other assets on our balance sheet, including strategic investments and intangible assets, whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that their carrying value may not be recoverable. Our estimate of the fair value of the assets may be based on fair value appraisals or discounted cash flow models using various inputs. During fiscal 2019 and 2017, we recorded impairment charges on our indefinite lived intangible assets of $0.3 million and $0.4 million, respectively, related to non amortizing intangible assets arising from our acquisition of Creagh Medical. Future impairment of the goodwill or other assets on our balance sheet could materially adversely affect our results of operations. Research and development costs may adversely affect our operating results and our agreement with Abbott provides that we are responsible for certain of these costs related to the SurVeil DCB. The success of our business depends on a number of factors, including our continued research and development of new technologies for future commercialization. In recent years, we have expended considerable resources researching and developing our DCB platform. In fiscal 2019, research and development costs increased 29% over fiscal 2018 and were 53% of our total revenue, which had a significant impact on our overall operating results. In fiscal 2020, we expect to continue the clinical evaluation of the SurVeil DCB and will conduct additional development and clinical activities for the below the knee, AV fistula and other whole product solutions products, which will result in significant R&D and SG&A expenses that will impact our operating results, including our profitability, in fiscal 2020. The agreement that we entered into with Abbott provides that we are responsible for conducting all necessary clinical trials and other activities required to achieve U.S. and EU regulatory clearances for the SurVeil DCB, including completion of the ongoing TRANSCEND clinical trial, which will involve significant costs. In addition to the costs of these research and development activities, these activities are subject to risks of failure that are inherent in the development of new medical technologies or products. There can be no assurance that we will be successful in developing new technologies or products, or that any such technology will be commercialized. We recognize revenue in accordance with various complex accounting standards, and changes in circumstances or interpretations may lead to accounting adjustments and failure to implement these standards might impact the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting or impact the reliability of our financial reporting. Our revenue recognition policies involve application of various complex accounting standards, including accounting guidance associated with revenue arrangements with multiple deliverables. Our compliance with such accounting standards often involves management judgment regarding whether the criteria set forth in the standards have been met such that we can recognize as revenue the amounts that we receive as payment for our products or services. We base our judgments on assumptions that we believe to be reasonable under the circumstances. However, these judgments, or the assumptions underlying them, may change over time. In addition, the SEC or the Financial Accounting Standards Board ( FASB ) may issue new positions or revised guidance on the treatment of complex accounting matters. Changes in circumstances or third party guidance could cause our judgments to change with respect to our interpretations of these complex standards, and transactions recorded, including revenue recognized, for 1 or more prior reporting periods, could be adversely affected. Our business includes foreign operations which exposes us to certain risks related to fluctuations in U.S. dollar and foreign currency exchange rates. The Company reports its consolidated financial statements in U. S. dollars. In a period where the U.S. dollar is strengthening or weakening as compared with the Euro, our revenue and expenses denominated in the Euro are translated into U.S. dollars at a lower or higher value than they would be in an otherwise constant currency exchange rate environment. As our foreign operations expand, the effects may become material to our consolidated financial statements. 20 Changes in product mix and increased manufacturing costs could cause our product gross margin percentage to fluctuate or decline in the future. Changes in our product mix and increases in manufacturing costs could cause our gross profit percentage to fluctuate or decline in the future. These factors, together with the scale up of our manufacturing operations, particularly in Ireland, adversely affected our gross margin percentage for the last fiscal year and these factors will likely continue to affect our gross profit percentage in 2020 and beyond. However, whether this adverse mix impact will result in a decline of our gross profit percentage in any given year will depend on the extent to which they are, or are not, offset by positive impacts to product gross margin during such year. RISKS RELATING TO OUR OPERATIONS AND RELIANCE ON THIRD PARTIES We rely on third parties to market, distribute and sell most products incorporating our coating and device technologies, as well as our whole product solutions. A principal element of our business strategy is to enter into licensing arrangements with medical device and other companies that manufacture products incorporating our technologies. For the years ended September 30, 2019, 2018 and 2017, we have derived 48%, 44%, and 44%, respectively, of our revenue from royalties and license fees derived from such licensing arrangements. The revenue that we derive from such arrangements is dependent on our ability, or our licensees ability to successfully develop, obtain successful regulatory approval for, manufacture (if applicable), market and sell products incorporating our technologies. In addition, in fiscal 2018, we entered into an agreement with Abbott whereby Abbott will have exclusive worldwide commercialization rights for the SurVeil DCB. Abbott has the right to purchase commercial units from us and we will realize revenue from product sales to Abbott at an agreed upon transfer price, as well as a share of net profits resulting from third party product sales by Abbott. Upon receipt of regulatory approval, we will rely on Abbott to effectively market and sell the SurVeil DCB. Additionally, a licensee could modify their product in such a way that it no longer incorporates our technology. Many of these factors are outside of our control and the failure on the part of our licensees to successfully meet these requirements could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Moreover, under our standard license agreements, licensees can terminate the license for any reason upon 90 days prior written notice. Existing and potential licensees have no obligation to deal exclusively with us and may pursue parallel development or licensing of competing technologies on their own or with third parties. A decision by a licensee to terminate its relationship with us could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. Failure on the part of our licensees to successfully meet these requirements could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. 21 A portion of our IVD business relies on distribution agreements and relationship s with various third parties and any adverse change in those relationships could result in a loss of revenue and harm that business. We sell many of our IVD products outside of the U.S. through distributors. Some of our distributors also sell our competitors products, and if they favor our competitors products for any reason, they may fail to market our products as effectively or to devote resources necessary to provide effective sales, which would cause our results to suffer. Additionally, we serve as the exclusive distributor in the U.S., Canada and Puerto Rico for DIARECT AG for its recombinant and native antigens. The success of these arrangements with these third parties depends, in part, on the continued adherence to the terms of our agreements with them. Any disruption in these arrangements will adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations. We rely on our customers to accurately report and make payments under our agreements with them. We rely on our customers to determine whether the products that they sell are royalty bearing and, if so, report and pay the amount of royalties owed to us under our agreements with them. The majority of our license agreements with our customers give us the right to audit their records to verify the accuracy of their reports to us. However, these audits can be expensive, time consuming and possibly detrimental to our ongoing business relationships with our customers. Inaccuracies in these reports have resulted in, and could result in, additional overpayments or underpayments of royalties, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We currently have limited or no redundancy in our manufacturing facilities, and we may lose revenue and be unable to maintain our customer relationships if we lose our production capacity. We manufacture all of our medical device coating reagents (and provide coating manufacturing services for certain customers) and our IVD products at 1 of our Eden Prairie, Minnesota facilities. We also manufacture balloon catheter products at our facility in Ballinasloe, Ireland and catheter based medical devices in limited quantities in 1 of our facilities in Eden Prairie, Minnesota. We plan to manufacture substantially all of our whole product solutions devices in our Ireland facility. Our SurVeil DCB is currently manufactured in 1 of our Eden Prairie, Minnesota facilities as we scale up our Irish facility for DCB manufacturing. While we plan to maintain secondary, redundant manufacturing capacity once full scale up has been achieved in our Ireland facility, our Ireland facility is not yet fully scaled up. If our existing production facilities become incapable of manufacturing products for any reason, we may be unable to meet production requirements, we may lose revenue and we may not be able to maintain our relationships with our customers, including certain of our licensees. In addition, because most of our customers use our coating reagents to manufacture their own products that generate royalty revenue for us, failure by us to supply these reagents could result in decreased royalty revenue, as well as decreased revenue from our surface modification coating technologies product sales. Without our existing production facilities, we would have no other means of manufacturing products until we were able to restore the manufacturing capability at these facilities or develop 1 or more alternative manufacturing facilities. Although we carry business interruption insurance to cover lost revenue and profits in an amount we consider adequate, this insurance does not cover all possible situations. In addition, our business interruption insurance would not compensate us for the loss of opportunity and potential adverse impact on relations with our existing customers resulting from our inability to produce products for them. We may face product liability claims related to participation in clinical trials or the use or misuse of our products. The development and sale of medical devices and comp1nt products involves an inherent risk of product liability claims. For medical device products that incorporate our coating technology, most of the licenses provide us with indemnification against such claims. However, there can be no guarantee that product liability claims will not be filed against us for such products, or for medical device products that we manufacture as part of our whole product solutions strategy, that parties indemnifying us will have the financial ability to honor their indemnification obligations or that such manufacturers will not seek indemnification or other relief from us for any such claims. Any product liability claims, with or without merit, could result in costly litigation, reduced sales, significant liabilities and diversion of our management time, attention and resources. We have obtained a level of liability insurance coverage that we believe is appropriate to our activities, however, we cannot be sure that our product liability insurance coverage is adequate or that it will continue to be available to us on acceptable terms, if at all. Furthermore, we do not expect to be able to obtain insurance covering our costs and losses as a result of any recall of products or devices incorporating our technologies because of alleged defects, whether such recall is instituted by us, by a customer, or is required by a regulatory agency. A product liability claim, recall or other claim with respect to uninsured liabilities or for amounts in excess of insured liabilities could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. 22 Our revenue will be harmed if we cannot purchase sufficient comp1nts that we use in our manufacture of reagents. We currently purchase some of the comp1nts we use to manufacture reagents from sole suppliers. If any of our sole suppliers becomes unwilling to supply comp1nts to us, experiences an interruption in its production or is otherwise unable to provide us with sufficient material to manufacture our reagents, we will experience production interruptions. If we lose our sole supplier of any particular reagent comp1nt or are otherwise unable to procure all comp1nts required for our reagent manufacturing for an extended period of time, we may lose the ability to manufacture the reagents our customers require to commercialize products incorporating our technology. This could result in lost royalties and product sales, which would harm our financial results. Adding suppliers to our approved vendor list may require significant time and resources. We routinely attempt to maintain multiple suppliers of each of our significant materials, so we have alternative suppliers, if necessary. However, if the number of suppliers of a material is reduced, or if we are otherwise unable to obtain our material requirements on a timely basis and on favorable terms, our operations may be harmed. We are dependent upon key personnel and may not be able to attract qualified personnel in the future. Our success is dependent upon our ability to retain and attract highly qualified management and technical personnel. We face intense competition for such qualified personnel. We do not maintain key person insurance, and we generally do not enter into employment agreements, except with certain executive officers. Although we have non compete agreements with most employees, there can be no assurance that such agreements will be enforceable. The loss of the services of 1 or more key employees or the failure to attract and retain additional qualified personnel could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Security breaches and other disruptions could compromise our information and expose us to liability, which would cause our business and reputation to suffer. We collect and store sensitive data, including intellectual property, our proprietary business information and that of our customers, suppliers and business partners, and personally identifiable information of our customers and employees, on our ne2rks. The secure maintenance of this information is critical to our operations and business strategy and our customers expect that we will securely maintain their information. Despite our security measures, our information technology and infrastructure may be vulnerable to attacks by hackers resulting from employee error, malfeasance or other disruptions. Any such breach could compromise our ne2rks and the information stored there could be accessed, publicly disclosed, lost or stolen. Any such access, disclosure or other loss of information could result in legal claims or proceedings, liability under personal privacy laws and regulatory penalties, disrupt our operations and the services that we provide to our customers, damage our reputation and cause a loss of confidence in our products and services, any of which could adversely affect our business and competitive position. RISKS RELATING TO OUR INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY We may not be able to obtain, maintain or protect proprietary rights necessary for the commercialization of our technologies. Our success depends, in large part, on our ability to obtain and maintain patents and trade secrets. We have been granted U.S. and foreign patents and have U.S. and foreign patent applications pending related to our proprietary technologies. There can be no assurance that any pending patent application will be approved, that we will develop additional proprietary technologies that are patentable, that any patents issued will provide us with competitive advantages or will not be challenged or invalidated by third parties, that the patents of others will not prevent the commercialization of products incorporating our technologies, or that others will not independently develop similar technologies or design around our patents. Furthermore, because we generate a significant amount of our revenue through licensing arrangements, the loss or expiration of patent protection for our licensed technologies will result in a reduction of the revenue derived from these arrangements which may have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flow, results of operations, financial position and prospects. We may become involved in expensive and unpredictable patent litigation or other intellectual property proceedings which could result in liability for damages, or impair our development and commercialization efforts. Our commercial success also will depend, in part, on our ability to avoid infringing patent or other intellectual property rights of third parties. There has been substantial litigation regarding patent and other intellectual property rights in the medical device and pharmaceutical industries, and intellectual property litigation may be used against us as a means of gaining a competitive advantage. Intellectual property litigation is complex, time consuming and expensive, and the outcome of such litigation is difficult to predict. If we were found to be infringing any third party patent or other intellectual property right, we could be required to pay 23 significant damages, alter our products or processes, obtain licenses from others, which we may not be able to do on commercially reasonable terms, if at all, or cease commercialization of our products and processes. Any of these outcomes could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Patent litigation or certain other administrative proceedings may also be necessary to enforce our patents or to determine the scope and validity of third party proprietary rights. These activities could result in substantial cost to us, even if the eventual outcome is favorable to us. An adverse outcome of any such litigation or interference proceeding could subject us to significant liabilities to third parties, require disputed rights to be licensed from third parties or require us to cease using our technology. Any action to defend or prosecute intellectual property would be costly and result in significant diversion of the efforts of our management and technical personnel, regardless of outcome, and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. If we are unable to keep our trade secrets confidential, our technology and proprietary information may be used by others to compete against us. We rely significantly upon proprietary technology, information, processes and know how that are not subject to patent protection. We seek to protect this information through trade secret or confidentiality agreements with our employees, consultants, potential licensees, or other parties as well as through other security measures. There can be no assurance that these agreements or any security measure will provide meaningful protection for our un patented proprietary information. In addition, our trade secrets may otherwise become known or be independently developed by competitors. If we determine that our proprietary rights have been misappropriated, we may seek to enforce our rights which would draw upon our financial resources and divert the time and efforts of our management, and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. If we are unable to convert our customers to our advanced generation of hydrophilic coating technology, our royalty revenue may decrease. In our Medical Device business unit, we have licensed our PhotoLink hydrophilic technology to a number of our customers for use in a variety of medical device surface applications. We have several U.S. and international issued patents and pending international patent applications protecting various aspects of these technologies, including compositions, methods of manufacture and methods of coating devices. The expiration dates for these patents and the anticipated expiration dates of the patent applications range from fiscal 2020 to 2035. These patents and patent applications represent distinct families, with each family generally covering a successive generation of the technology, including improvements that enhance coating performance, manufacturability, or other important features desired by our customers. Approximately 21% of our total revenue in fiscal 2019 was generated from our fourth generation PhotoLink technology, which are protected by a family of patents that will begin to expire in fiscal 2020. Of the license agreements using our early generation technologies, most will continue to generate royalty revenue at a reduced royalty rate beyond patent expiration. In recent years, we have successfully converted a number of our customers products utilizing our early generation technologies to 1 of our advanced generation technologies. While we are actively seeking to convert our customers to 1 of our advanced generations of our hydrophilic coating technology, there can be no assurance that we will be successful in doing so, or that those customers that have converted, or will convert, will sell products utilizing our technology which will generate earned royalty revenue for us. If we or any of our licensees breach any of the agreements under which we have in licensed intellectual property from others, we could be deprived of important intellectual property rights and future revenue. We are a party to various agreements through which we have in licensed or otherwise acquired rights to certain technologies that are important to our business. In exchange for the rights granted to us under these agreements, we have agreed to meet certain research, development, commercialization, sublicensing, royalty, indemnification, insurance or other obligations. If we or 1 of our licensees fails to comply with these obligations set forth in the relevant agreement through which we have acquired rights, we may be unable to effectively use, license, or otherwise exploit the relevant intellectual property rights and may be deprived of current or future revenue that is associated with such intellectual property. 24 RISKS RELATING TO CLINICAL AND REGULATORY MATTERS The development of new products and enhancement of existing products requires significant research and development, clinical trials and regulatory approvals, all of which may be very expensive and time consuming and may not result in commercially viable products. The development of new products and enhancement of existing products requires significant investment in research and development, clinical trials and regulatory approvals. There can be no assurance that any products now in development, or that we may seek to develop in the future, will achieve technological feasibility, obtain regulatory approval or gain market acceptance. If we are unable to obtain regulatory approval for new products or enhanced products, our ability to successfully compete in the markets in which we participate may be materially adversely impacted. A delay in the development or approval of new products and technologies may also adversely impact the timing of when these products contribute to our future revenue and earnings growth. Delays in clinical studies are common and have many causes, and any significant delay in clinical studies being conducted by us could result in delays in obtaining regulatory approvals and jeopardize the ability to proceed to commercialization of our products. We began enrollment in the TRANSCEND clinical study for our SurVeil DCB in the first quarter of fiscal 2018 and, in December 2018, we commenced a first in human clinical study of our Avess DCB. There are risks involved in these and other clinical studies, including that they may fail to enroll a sufficient number of patients for a variety of reasons or be completed on schedule, if at all. Clinical trials for any of our products could be delayed for a variety of reasons, including, but not limited to delays in reaching agreement with applicable regulatory authorities on a clinical study design; issuance of publications or communications relating to the safety of certain medical devices, including recent studies and communications regarding the evaluation of risks associated with paclitaxel coated products including the FDA notice menti1d above; suspension or termination of a clinical study by us, the FDA or foreign regulatory authorities due to adverse events or safety concerns relating to our product; and delays in recruiting suitable patients willing to participate in a trial, or delays in having patients complete participation or return for post treatment follow up. If the initiation or completion of any of the ongoing or planned clinical studies for our products is delayed for any of the above or other reasons, the regulatory approval process would be delayed and the ability to commercialize and commence sales of our products could be materially harmed. Additionally, clinical study delays may allow our competitors to bring products to market before we do, which could impair our ability to successfully commercialize our product candidates. Any of these events could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Healthcare policy changes may have a material adverse effect on us. Healthcare costs have risen significantly during the past decade. There have been and continue to be proposals by legislators, regulators and third party payers to keep these costs down. Certain proposals, if implemented, would impose limitations on the prices our customers will be able to charge for our products, or the amounts of reimbursement available for their products from governmental agencies or third party payers, or otherwise negatively impact pricing and reimbursement. Because a significant portion of our revenue is currently derived from royalties on products which constitute a percentage of our customer product selling price, these limitations could have an adverse effect on our revenue. The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (the ACA ) imposes significant new taxes on medical device makers who make up a significant portion of our customers. Although significant comp1nts of these taxes have been suspended until December 31, 2019, their status is unclear for subsequent years. The legislation has resulted in a significant total cost increase to the medical device and diagnostic industries, which could have a material, negative impact on both the financial condition of our customers as well as on our customers ability to attract financing, their willingness to commit capital to development projects or their ability to commercialize their products utilizing our technology, any of which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. There continues to be substantial risk to our customers, and therefore us, from the uncertainty 25 which continues to surround the future of health care delivery and reimbursement both in the U.S. and abroad. In particular, we cannot predict what other heal thcare programs and regulations will ultimately be implemented at the federal or state level or the effect of any future legislation or regulation in the U.S. or abroad may have on our business. Whole product solutions medical devices and other products incorporating our technologies are subject to increasing scrutiny and regulations, including extensive approval clearance processes and manufacturing requirements. Any adverse regulatory and or enforcement action (for us or our licensees) may materially affect our financial condition and business operations. As a result of the March 15, 2019 FDA communication and the potential long term mortality signal related to the use of paclitaxel coated devices, the regulatory body with which we applied for a Conformit Europ enne Mark ( CE Mark ) to allow for commercialization of SurVeil in the European Union ( EU ) has notified us that they have temporarily paused review of submissions of paclitaxel coated devices. This pause and the current regulatory debate over paclitaxel coated devices have caused uncertainty regarding our goal of receiving a CE Mark by the end of calendar 2019 and subsequent commercialization of the product in fiscal 2020. There can be no assurance that we will receive CE Mark or U.S. FDA approval for our SurVeil DCB or other proprietary medical device products that are currently being developed. Our products and our business activities are subject to a complex regime of regulations both in the U.S. and internationally. Additionally, certain state governments and the federal government have enacted legislation aimed at increasing transparency of industry interactions with health care providers. Any failure to comply with these legal and regulatory requirements could impact our business. In addition, we will continue to devote substantial additional time and financial resources to further develop and implement policies, systems, and processes to comply with enhanced legal and regulatory requirements, which may also impact our business. We anticipate that governmental authorities will continue to scrutinize our industry closely, and that additional regulation may increase compliance and legal costs, exposure to litigation, and other adverse effects to our operations. To varying degrees, the FDA and comparable agencies outside the US require us to comply with laws and regulations governing the development, testing, manufacturing, labeling, marketing, and distribution of our products. Our compliance with these laws and regulations takes significant time resources, involves stringent testing surveillance, involves attention to any needed product improvements (such as modifications, repairs, or replacements), and may include significant limitations of the uses of our products. Changes in existing regulations or adoption of new governmental regulations or policies could prevent or delay regulatory approval of products incorporating our technologies or subject us to additional regulation. Failure or delay by us or our licensees in obtaining FDA and other necessary regulatory approval or clearance, or the loss of previously obtained approvals, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our facilities and procedures are subject to periodic inspections by the FDA to determine compliance with the FDA requirements. The results of these inspections can include inspectional observations on FDA Form 483, warning letters, or other forms of enforcement. The FDA has significantly increased its oversight of companies subject to its regulations, including medical device companies. If the FDA were to conclude that we are not in compliance with applicable laws or regulations, or that any of our medical devices are ineffective or pose an unreasonable health risk, the FDA could ban such medical devices, detain or seize adulterated or misbranded medical devices, order a recall, repair, replacement, or refund of such devices, refuse to grant pending pre market approval applications or require certificates of non U.S governments for exports, and or require us to notify health professionals and others that the devices present unreasonable risks of substantial harm to the public health. The FDA may also assess civil or criminal penalties against us, our officers or employees and impose operating restrictions on a company wide basis, or enjoin and or restrain certain conduct resulting in violations of applicable law. The FDA may also recommend prosecution to the U.S. Department of Justice. Any adverse regulatory action, depending on its magnitude, may restrict us from effectively marketing and selling our products and limit our ability to obtain future pre market clearances or approvals, and could result in a substantial modification to our business practices and operations. We may face liability if we mishandle or improperly dispose of the hazardous materials used in some of our research, development and manufacturing processes. Our research, development and manufacturing activities sometimes involve the controlled use of various hazardous materials. Although we believe that our safety procedures for handling and disposing of such materials comply with the standards prescribed by state and federal regulations, the risk of accidental contamination or injury from these materials cannot be completely eliminated. While we currently maintain insurance in amounts that we believe are appropriate, we could be held liable for any 26 damages that might result from any such event. Any such liability could exceed our insurance and available r esources and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Additionally, certain of our activities are regulated by federal and state agencies in addition to the FDA. For example, activities in connection with disposal of certain chemical waste are subject to regulation by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. We could be held liable in the event of improper disposal of such materials, even if these acts were d1 by third parties. Some of our reagent chemicals must be registered with the agency, with basic information filed related to toxicity during the manufacturing process as well as the toxicity of the final product. Failure to comply with existing or future regulatory requirements could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. RISKS RELATING TO OUR SECURITIES Our stock price has been volatile and may continue to be volatile. The trading price of our common stock has been, and is likely to continue to be, highly volatile, in large part attributable to developments and circumstances related to factors identified in Forward Looking Statements and Risk Factors. Our common stock price may rise or fall sharply at any time because of this volatility, as a result of sales executed by significant holders of our stock, and also because of short positions taken by investors from time to time in our stock. For instance, the market prices for securities of medical technology, drug delivery and biotechnology companies historically have been highly volatile, and the market has experienced significant price and volume fluctuations that may be unrelated to the operating performance of particular companies. ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS . N1 ITEM 2 ITEM 2 PROPERTIES
